Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB681.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1402(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1402. Health Services.--(a) Each child of school age shall be given by methods established by the Advisory Health Board, (1) a hearing test by a school nurse or medical technician, (2) a measurement of height and weight by a school nurse or [teacher] other health care practitioner , who shall <--1234567891011121314151617181920 collect that information in a manner that protects student confidentiality and shall use the measurement to [compute] TRACK a child's [weight-for-height ratio] growth pattern UNDER 28 PA. CODE § 23.7 (RELATING TO HEIGHT AND WEIGHT MEASUREMENTS), (3) tests for tuberculosis under medical supervision, and (4) such other tests as the Advisory Health Board may deem advisable to protect the health of the child.* * *(a.3) A student shall be exempt from measurement of height and weight if the student's parent or LEGAL guardian requests an exemption in writing. A school district shall provide notification to a student's parent or legal guardian regarding the procedure to request an exemption.* * *Section 2. Section 1408 of the act is amended to read:Section 1408. Reports.--(a) Every school district of the Commonwealth or school districts jointly, school physicians, school dentists and school nurses, shall file with the Secretary of Health and/or the [Superintendent of Public Instruction] SECRETARY OF EDUCATION such reports as required by the regulations of the two departments.(b) Height and weight measurements may SHALL be calculated into a body mass index by a school nurse or other trained health care practitioner employed by the school district . SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF REPORTING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION. A school district may not deliver a student's body mass index to either the student or the student's parent or guardian unless requested by the parent or guardian in writing. A school district shall report the recorded height and weight measurements and body mass index calculation to the Secretary of Health in a manner that 20250HB0681PN1882 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protects the confidentiality of the student's information. Section 3. Section 1422.2(a) and (d) of the act are amended and subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1422.2. Interagency Coordinating Council for Child Health, Nutrition and Physical Education.--(a) The Secretary of Education, the Secretary of Health, the Secretary of Human Services and the Secretary of Agriculture shall establish an interagency coordinating council which shall annually review, revise and publish a Pennsylvania Child Wellness Plan to promote child health, nutrition and physical education. The council shall be composed of employes of the Department of Education, the Department of Health, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Agriculture. The Secretary of Education shall appoint the chairman of the council.* * *(c) In the [initial] publication of the Pennsylvania Child Wellness Plan to promote child health, nutrition and physical education, the council shall integrate the contents of the Pennsylvania Nutrition and Activity Plan to Prevent Obesity and Related Chronic Diseases and [shall] may include additional recommendations regarding:* * *(7) The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program education program to improve the likelihood that families with children eligible for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program will make healthy food choices within a limited budget and choose physically active lifestyles.(d) The council shall submit the plan to the Secretary of Education, the Secretary of Health, THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES and the Secretary of Agriculture no later than May 1, 20250HB0681PN1882 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2007, and May 1 of each year thereafter. The Secretary of Education shall submit the final plan to the Governor, the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives by June 1, 2007, and June 1 of each year thereafter. The final plan shall be included on the [Department of Education's, Department of Health's and Department of Agriculture's Internet websites.] publicly accessible Internet websites of the Department of Education, Department of Health, Department of Human Services and Department of Agriculture.SECTION 4. SECTION 1512.1 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1512.1. PHYSICAL EDUCATION.--[THE] (A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B), THE BOARD OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS IN EVERY SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL ESTABLISH A CURRICULUM ALIGNED WITH PENNSYLVANIA ACADEMIC STANDARDS ON HEALTH, SAFETY AND PHYSICAL EDUCATION THAT PURSUANT TO 22 PA. CODE § 4.27 (RELATING TO PHYSICAL EDUCATION AND ATHLETICS), REQUIRES PUPILS ENROLLED IN THE DISTRICT TO PARTICIPATE IN PHYSICAL EDUCATION.(B) THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO ACADEMIC INSTRUCTION ON PERSONAL HEALTH, NUTRITION AND PHYSICAL FITNESS:(1) THE CALCULATION OF BODY MASS INDEX SHALL BE PROHIBITED.(2) ANY INSTRUCTION THAT REQUIRES THE COLLECTION OF A STUDENT'S HEIGHT AND WEIGHT MEASUREMENT INFORMATION SHALL BE CONDUCTED IN A MANNER THAT PROTECTS STUDENT CONFIDENTIALITY.Section 4 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0681PN1882 - 4 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526